Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; EMERGENCY ASSISTANCE FOR POSTSECONDARY STUDENTS.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for emergency grants to students of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities. These grants must be awarded directly to students to meet immediate needs that could interfere with the student completing the term or their program including but not limited to emergency housing, food, and transportation. The Minnesota State Colleges and Universities must minimize any negative impact on student financial aid resulting from the receipt of emergency funds. new text end